Hawaii, session 2026, SB3062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that experiential learning and hands-on training are essential to prepare students for careers in culinary arts, hospitality, and related fields. The legislature recognizes that work in these fields may occasionally involve cooking with or serving alcohol. Incorporating liquor into appropriate educational settings may therefore be helpful for enhancing student learning, skill development, and industry-relevant training.  The legislature also recognizes that other educational settings, like libraries, may sometimes benefit from incorporating liquor into certain exhibitions. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize state libraries and the university of Hawaii and its campuses to utilize liquor in certain educational settings, under certain conditions, without obtaining a liquor license. SECTION 2.  Chapter 281, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§281-    Liquor; limited license exemption.  Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or any other law to the contrary, the following entities may utilize liquor without obtaining a liquor license under part III; provided that the entities shall comply with section 281-4(c); provided further that any student or staff member serving or selling alcohol must satisfactorily complete the applicable county liquor commission-approved server training and test: (1)  The university of Hawaii and its campuses, solely to support education and training in culinary arts, hospitality, fermentation sciences, or a related field of study; provided further that liquor may be sold to the general public if incidental to the educational programs; and (2)  State libraries that are not located on department of education property or near public schools, as provided in applicable rules and laws, solely for the purposes of an educational exhibition; provided further that liquor shall not be sold to the general public." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.